Missouri, session 2026, HB3044.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 94, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 94.456, to read as follows:
94.456. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "City", a city with more than eight thousand but fewer than nine thousand
inhabitants and located in a county with more than sixty thousand but fewer than
seventy thousand inhabitants;
(2) "Transient guests", a person or persons who occupy a room or rooms in a
hotel or motel for thirty-one days or less during any calendar quarter.
2. (1) The governing body of a city may impose a tax on the charges for all
sleeping rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels or motels situated in the city or a
portion thereof.
(2) Such tax shall:
(a) Not exceed five percent per occupied room per night;
(b) Be in addition to the charge for the sleeping room and shall be in addition to
any and all other taxes; and
(c) Be stated separately from all other charges and taxes.
(3) The proceeds of such tax shall be used by the city for promotion of tourism
and related economic development purposes.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3044 2
(4) Such tax shall not become effective unless the governing body of the county
submits to the voters of the city, at any election available for the city, a proposal to
authorize the governing body of the city to impose the tax under this section.
3. (1) The question submitted for the tax authorized in this section shall be in
substantially the following form: "Shall ______ (insert city name) impose a tax on the
charges for all sleeping rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels and motels situated
in ______ (insert city name) at a rate of ______ (insert percentage) percent, the proceeds
of which shall be used for promotion of tourism and related economic development
purposes?".
(2) If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting
thereon are in favor of the question, the tax shall become effective on the first day of the
second calendar quarter following the calendar quarter in which the election was held.
If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are
opposed to the question, the tax shall not become effective unless and until the question
is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters and such question is approved
by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
✔